Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.133

Promotional hosting expenditures—Rules.

The commission is authorized to adopt rules governing promotional hosting expenditures by commission employees, agents, or board members under RCW 15.04.200.

[ 2002 c 313 s 99.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.